Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7404
Applicability of act.

The Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act applies to all insurers issuing, providing, delivering, arranging for, or renewing in this state any policy of insurance.

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 17.